Utah statutes.
31A-25-209.   Probation -- Grounds for revocation.
(1)  The commissioner may place a licensee on probation for a period not to
exceed 24 months as follows:
(a)  after an adjudicative proceeding under Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, for any circumstances that would justify a
suspension under Section 31A-25-208; or
(b)  at the issuance of a new license:
(i)  with an admitted violation under 18 U.S.C. Sections 1033 and 1034; or
(ii)  with a response to a background information question on a new license
application indicating that:
(A)  the person has been convicted of a crime that is listed by rule made in
accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, as a
crime that is grounds for probation;
(B)  the person is currently charged with a crime that is listed by rule made
in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
as a crime that is grounds for probation regardless of whether adjudication is
withheld;
(C)  the person has been involved in an administrative proceeding regarding
any professional or occupational license; or
(D)  any business in which the person is or was an owner, partner, officer, or
director has been involved in an administrative proceeding regarding any
professional or occupational license.
(2)  The commissioner may place a licensee on probation for a specified period
no longer than 24 months if the licensee has admitted to a violation under 18
U.S.C. Sections 1033 and 1034.
(3)  A probation order under this section shall state the conditions for
retention of the license, which shall be reasonable.
(4)  A violation of the probation is grounds for revocation pursuant to any
proceeding authorized under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures
Act.
